Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.114

Firearm sales or transfers—Denial of application report—Dealer's duties. (Contingent expiration date.)

(1) A dealer shall report to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs information on each instance where the dealer denies an application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm, whether under RCW 9.41.090 or 9.41.113, or the requirements of federal law, as the result of a background check or completed and submitted firearm purchase or transfer application that indicates the applicant is ineligible to possess a firearm under state or federal law. The dealer shall report the denied application information to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs within five days of the denial in a format as prescribed by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The reported information must include the identifying information of the applicant, the date of the application and denial of the application, and other information or documents as prescribed by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. In any case where the purchase or transfer of a firearm is initially denied by the dealer as the result of a background check that indicates the applicant is ineligible to possess a firearm, but the purchase or transfer is subsequently approved, the dealer shall report the subsequent approval to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs within one day of the approval.

(2) Upon denying an application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm as a result of a background check or completed and submitted firearm purchase or transfer application that indicates the applicant is ineligible to possess a firearm under state or federal law, the dealer shall:

(a) Provide the applicant with a copy of a notice form generated and distributed by the Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.823(5), informing denied applicants of their right to appeal the denial; and

(b) Retain the original records of the attempted purchase or transfer of a firearm for a period not less than six years.

[ 2017 c 261 s 1.]

PDFRCW 9.41.114

Firearm sales or transfers—Denial of application report—Dealer's duties. (Contingent effective date.)

Upon denying an application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm as a result of a background check by the Washington state patrol firearms background check program or completed and submitted firearm purchase or transfer application that indicates the applicant is ineligible to possess a firearm under state or federal law, the dealer shall:

(1) Provide the applicant with a copy of a notice form generated and distributed by the Washington state patrol firearms background check program under RCW 43.43.823(6), informing denied applicants of their right to appeal the denial; and

(2) Retain the original records of the attempted purchase or transfer of a firearm for a period not less than six years.

[ 2024 c 289 s 4; 2020 c 28 s 5; 2017 c 261 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 289: See note following RCW 9.41.111.

Contingent effective date—2020 c 28 ss 5-9: "Sections 5 through 9 of this act take effect on the date that is thirty days after the Washington state patrol issues a notification to dealers that a state firearms background check system is established under section 1 of this act. The Washington state patrol shall provide written notice of the effective date of sections 5 through 9 of this act to the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the Washington state patrol." [ 2020 c 28 s 10.]